Hawaii statutes.
[§134-3.5] Disclosure for firearm permit
and registration purposes. A health care provider or public health
authority shall disclose health information, including protected health care
information, relating to an individual's mental health history, to the
appropriate county chief of police in response to a request for the information
from the chief of police; provided that:

(1) The information shall be used only for the
purpose of evaluating the individual's fitness to acquire or own a firearm; and

(2) The individual has signed a waiver permitting
release of the health information for that purpose. [L 2001, c 252, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next